Hawaii statutes.
[§195D-29] Release or establishment of
endangered or threatened species outside its current range. The department
may authorize the release or establishment of any population, including eggs,
propagules, or individuals, of an endangered or threatened species outside its
current or historic range, after consulting with the endangered species
recovery committee, if the release or establishment is likely to further the
conservation of the species. [L 1997, c 380, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next